Hawaii statutes.
§601-9 Same, other instances. No
attorney shall be employed, or allowed to appear before any court, in any
action or proceeding which has been previously tried before the attorney as a
judge. [CC 1859, pt of §821; RL 1925, §2214; RL 1935, §3574; RL 1945, §9575; RL
1955, §213-5; HRS §601-9; am L 1972, c 88, §1(d); gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next